Mississippi, session 2026, HB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-21-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-21-43.  (1)  There is * * * hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund designated as the Civil Legal Assistance Fund.  The * * *funds fund shall be administered by the Supreme Court through the Administrative Office of Courts.  The Administrative Office of Courts may also accept monies from any public or private source for deposit into the fund.  Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned from the investment of monies in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the * * *funds fund. (2)  All monies shall be allocated to only those organizations providing legal services to low income Mississippians. The fees collected by clerks of the chancery court pursuant to Section 25-7-9 and clerks of the circuit court pursuant to Section 25-7-13 to be deposited into the fund shall be allocated to the Mississippi Center for Legal Services. Furthermore, no monies from this fund shall be expended to provide legal services in matters currently prohibited by the Legal Services Corporation, Washington, D.C., and no funds shall be expended on persons who are not financially eligible to receive legal services as directed by the Legal Services Corporation, Washington, D.C. (3)  The monies appropriated shall be distributed to eligible legal services programs based on the percentage of poverty population within the program service area, consistent with the formula used by the Legal Services Corporation. (4)  Monies appropriated to the fund may be used to promote increased participation by the private bar in the delivery of legal services to the indigent through the Mississippi Volunteer Lawyers Project. (5)  Recipients of funds shall have the following duties: (a)  To develop, operate and administer programs within their respective service areas that provide free legal services to indigent clients involved in civil matters; (b)  To report annually to the Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of Courts, on its activities, including providing a copy of its annual audit that accounts for the use of the funds; and (c)  To refund annually all unused or uncommitted funds. SECTION 2.  Section 25-7-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [From and after January 1, 2024, and through December 31, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 25-7-9.  (1)  The clerks of the chancery courts shall charge the following fees: (a)  For the act of certifying copies of filed documents, for each complete document................................ $     1.00 (b)  (i)  Recording each deed, will, lease, amendment, subordination, lien, release, cancellation, order, decree, oath, etc., per book and page listed where applicable, each deed of trust, or any other document, for the first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 (ii)  Each additional page.............. $     1.00 (c)  (i)  Recording oil and gas leases, cancellations, etc., including indexing in general indices; for the first five (5) pages............................................ $ 25.00 (ii)  Recording each oil and gas assignment, amendment of assignment, release, etc., first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 per additional assignee............................... $ 18.00 (iii)  Each additional page............. $     1.00 (iv)  Sectional index entries per section or subdivision lot.................................................. $     1.00 (v)  Archive fee....................... $     1.00 (vi)  Entering marginal notations, if requested on document or by cover letter, pertaining to the recording of any oil and gas document only per book and page................... $     4.00 (d)  (i)  Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file: If performed by the clerk or his employee, per page............................................. $ .50 If performed by any other person, per page............................................. $ .25 (ii)  Entering marginal notations on documents of record................................... $ 1.00 (e)  For attending the board of supervisors' meeting, an annual sum not exceeding..................................... $ 2,500.00 (f)  For other services as clerk of the board of supervisors an allowance shall be made to him (payable semiannually at the July and January meetings) out of the county treasury, an annual sum not exceeding..................................................... $ 5,500.00 (g)  For each day's attendance on the chancery court, to be approved by the chancellor: For the first chancellor sitting only, clerk and two (2) deputies, each..................................................... $ 85.00 For the second chancellor sitting, clerk only.......... $    85.00 Provided that the fees herein prescribed shall be the total remuneration for the clerk and his deputies for attending chancery court. (h)  On order of the court, clerks and not more than two (2) deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for each term of court for attendance upon the court to get up records. (i)  For public service not otherwise specifically provided for, the chancery court may by order allow the clerk to be paid by the county on the order of the board of supervisors, an annual sum not exceeding............................................ $ 5,000.00 (j)  For each civil filing, to be deposited into the Civil Legal Assistance Fund......................... $      * * *5.00 15.00 The chancery clerk shall itemize on the original document a detailed fee bill of all charges due or paid for filing, recording and abstracting same.  No person shall be required to pay such fees until same have been so itemized, but those fees may be demanded before the document is recorded. (2)  The following fee shall be a total fee for all services performed by the clerk with respect to any civil case filed that includes, but is not limited to, divorce, alteration of birth or marriage certificate, removal of minority, guardianship or conservatorship, estate of deceased, adoption that does not involve the Department of Child Protection Services, land dispute injunction, settlement of small claim, contempt, modification, partition suit, or commitment, which shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the chancery clerk at the time of filing.  The clerk or his successor in office shall perform all duties set forth without additional compensation or fee....... $    85.00 (3)  For every civil case filed: (a)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund established in Section 9-21-14................................................... $ 10.00 (b)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45....................................... $ 40.00 (4)  Cost of process shall be borne by the issuing party.  Additionally, should the attorney or person filing the pleadings desire the clerk to pay the cost to the sheriff for serving process on one (1) person or more, or to pay the cost of publication, the clerk shall demand the actual charges therefor, at the time of filing. (5)  For each civil case filed including an adoption involving the Department of Child Protection Services, the filing shall be exempt from any fee under this section. [From and after January 1, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] 25-7-9.  (1)  The clerks of the chancery courts shall charge the following fees: (a)  For the act of certifying copies of filed documents, for each complete document................................ $     1.00 (b)  (i)  Recording each deed, will, lease, amendment, subordination, lien, release, cancellation, order, decree, oath, etc., per book and page listed where applicable, each deed of trust, or any other document, for the first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 (ii)  Each additional page.............. $     1.00 (c)  (i)  Recording oil and gas leases, cancellations, etc., including indexing in general indices; for the first five (5) pages   $ 25.00 (ii)  Recording each oil and gas assignment, amendment of assignment, release, etc., first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 per additional assignee............................... $ 18.00 (iii)  Each additional page............. $     1.00 (iv)  Sectional index entries per section or subdivision lot.................................................. $     1.00 (v)  Archive fee....................... $     1.00 (vi)  Entering marginal notations, if requested on document or by cover letter, pertaining to the recording of any oil and gas document only per book and page................... $     4.00 (d)  (i)  Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file: If performed by the clerk or his employee, per page............................................. $ .50 If performed by any other person, per page............................................. $ .25 (ii)  Entering marginal notations on documents of record................................... $ 1.00 (e)  For attending the board of supervisors' meeting an annual sum not exceeding..................................... $ 5,000.00 (f)  For other services as clerk of the board of supervisors an allowance shall be made to him (payable semiannually at the July and January meetings) out of the county treasury, an annual sum not exceeding..................................................... $10,000.00 (g)  For each day's attendance on the chancery court, to be approved by the chancellor: For the first chancellor sitting only, clerk and two (2) deputies, each................................................. $    85.00 For the second chancellor sitting, clerk only..... $ 85.00 Provided that the fees herein prescribed shall be the total remuneration for the clerk and his deputies for attending chancery court. (h)  On order of the court, clerks and not more than two (2) deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for each term of court for attendance upon the court to get up records. (i)  For public service not otherwise specifically provided for, the chancery court may by order allow the clerk to be paid by the county on the order of the board of supervisors, an annual sum not exceeding............................................ $ 5,000.00 (j)  For each civil filing, to be deposited into the Civil Legal Assistance Fund......................... $      * * *5.00 15.00 The chancery clerk shall itemize on the original document a detailed fee bill of all charges due or paid for filing, recording and abstracting same.  No person shall be required to pay such fees until same have been so itemized, but those fees may be demanded before the document is recorded. (2)  The following fee shall be a total fee for all services performed by the clerk with respect to any civil case filed that includes, but is not limited to, divorce, alteration of birth or marriage certificate, removal of minority, guardianship or conservatorship, estate of deceased, adoption that does not involve the Department of Child Protection Services, land dispute injunction, settlement of small claim, contempt, modification, partition suit, or commitment, which shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the chancery clerk at the time of filing.  The clerk or his successor in office shall perform all duties set forth without additional compensation or fee....... $    85.00 (3)  For every civil case filed: (a)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund established in Section 9-21-14................................................... $ 10.00 (b)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45....................................... $ 40.00 (4)  Cost of process shall be borne by the issuing party.  Additionally, should the attorney or person filing the pleadings desire the clerk to pay the cost to the sheriff for serving process on one (1) person or more, or to pay the cost of publication, the clerk shall demand the actual charges therefor, at the time of filing. (5)  For each civil case filed including an adoption involving the Department of Child Protection Services, the filing shall be exempt from any fee under this section. SECTION 3.  Section 25-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-7-13.  (1)  The clerks of the circuit court shall charge the following fees: (a)  Docketing, filing, marking and registering each complaint, petition and indictment................................ $   85.00 The fee set forth in this paragraph shall be the total fee for all services performed by the clerk up to and including entry of judgment with respect to each complaint, petition or indictment, including all answers, claims, orders, continuances and other papers filed therein, issuing each writ, summons, subpoena or other such instruments, swearing witnesses, taking and recording bonds and pleas, and recording judgments, orders, fiats and certificates; the fee shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the clerk at the time of collection.  The clerk or his or her successor in office shall perform all duties set forth above without additional compensation or fee. (b)  Docketing and filing each motion to renew judgment, notice of renewal of judgment, suggestion for a writ of garnishment, suggestion for a writ of execution and judgment debtor actions and issuing all process, filing and recording orders or other papers and swearing witnesses............................................. $ 35.00 (c)  For every civil case filed, an additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund established in Section 9-21-14.................... $   10.00 (d)  For every civil case filed, an additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45..................................... $ 40.00 (2)  Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the clerks of the circuit court shall charge the following fees: (a)  Filing and marking each order or other paper and recording and indexing same...................................... $    2.00 (b)  Issuing each writ, summons, subpoena, citation, capias and other such instruments................................. $    1.00 (c)  Administering an oath and taking bond.... $    2.00 (d)  Certifying copies of filed documents, for each complete document.............................................. $    1.00 (e)  Recording orders, fiats, licenses, certificates, oaths and bonds: First page........................................ $ 2.00 Each additional page.............................. $ 1.00 (f)  Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file and entering marginal notations on documents of record: If performed by the clerk or his or her employee, per page.............................................. $ 1.00 If performed by any other person, per page......... $ .25 (g)  Judgment roll entry..................... $    5.00 (h)  Taxing cost and certificate.............. $    1.00 (i)  For taking and recording application for marriage license, for filing and recording consent of parents when required by law, for filing and recording medical certificate, filing and recording proof of age, recording and issuing license, recording and filing returns $   35.00 The clerk shall deposit Fourteen Dollars ($14.00) of each fee collected for a marriage license in the Victims of Domestic Violence Fund established in Section 93-21-117, on a monthly basis. (j)  For certified copy of marriage license and search of record, the same fee charged by the Bureau of Vital Statistics of the State Board of Health. (k)  For public service not particularly provided for, the circuit court may allow the clerk, per annum, to be paid by the county on presentation of the circuit court's order, the following amount $5,000.00 However, in the counties having two (2) judicial districts, such above allowance shall be made for each judicial district. (l)  For drawing jurors and issuing venire, to be paid by the county................................................ $    5.00 (m)  For each day's attendance upon the circuit court term, for himself or herself and necessary deputies allowed by the court, each to be paid by the county.................................. $   85.00 (n)  Summons, each juror to be paid by the county upon the allowance of the court................................. $    1.00 (o)  For issuing each grand jury subpoena, to be paid by the county on allowance by the court, not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) in any one (1) term of court................................................. $ 1.00 (p)  For each civil filing, to be deposited into the Civil Legal Assistance Fund.......................... $ * * *5.00 15.00 (3)  On order of the court, clerks and deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for attendance upon the court to get up records. (4)  The clerk's fees in state cases where the state fails in the prosecution, or in cases of felony where the defendant is convicted and the cost cannot be made out of his or her estate, in an amount not to exceed Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) in one (1) year, shall be paid out of the county treasury on approval of the circuit court, and the allowance thereof by the board of supervisors of the county.  In counties having two (2) judicial districts, such allowance shall be made in each judicial district; however, the maximum thereof shall not exceed Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00).  Clerks in the circuit court, in cases where appeals are taken in criminal cases and no appeal bond is filed, shall be allowed by the board of supervisors of the county after approval of their accounts by the circuit court, in addition to the above fees, for making such transcript the rate of Two Dollars ($2.00) per page. (5)  The clerk of the circuit court may retain as his or her commission on all money coming into his or her hands, by law or order of the court, a sum to be fixed by the court not exceeding one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) on all such sums. (6)  For making final records required by law, including, but not limited to, circuit and county court minutes, and furnishing transcripts of records, the circuit clerk shall charge Two Dollars ($2.00) per page.  The same fees shall be allowed to all officers for making and certifying copies of records or papers which they are authorized to copy and certify. (7)  The circuit clerk shall prepare an itemized statement of fees for services performed, cost incurred, or for furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file, and shall submit the statement to the parties or, if represented, to their attorneys within sixty (60) days.  A bill for same shall accompany the statement. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.